Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF32.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1081XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 32 Section 1. Section 728.12, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) A visual depiction containing pictorial 3 representations of different minors shall be prosecuted and 4 punished as separate offenses for each pictorial representation 5 of a different minor in the visual depiction. However, 6 violations 7 (2) Violations of this subsection involving multiple 8 visual depictions of the same minor shall be prosecuted and 9 punished as one offense separate offenses for each pictorial 10 representation of the same minor . 11